Oklahoma, session 2026, SB427.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-712.1 of Title 63, unless

there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A hospital, medical facility, or long-term care facility

licensed by the State Department of Health shall publish on its

website, and keep updated, all policies and procedures of the

hospital, medical facility, or long-term care facility. The State

Commissioner of Health shall promulgate rules to implement this

section.





Req. No. 1568 Page 1

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-712.2 of Title 63, unless

there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. A hospital, medical facility, or long-term care facility

licensed by the State Department of Health shall establish policies

and procedures necessary to track and document all additions,

deletions, and other edits to a patient’s medical records.

B. Any person shall have the right to obtain, upon request,

detailed information of all additions, deletions, and other edits to

his or her medical records made by a hospital, medical facility, or

long-term care facility, or those of:

1. A minor child of whom the person is the parent or legal

guardian; or

2. Any other patient who lacks capacity to make medical

decisions and for whom the person has legal authority to make such

decisions and would have legal access to the patient’s medical

records.

SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.



60-1-1568 DC 1/14/2025 3:51:19 PM









Req. No. 1568 Page 2